Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-115.7 Applicability of other laws
to captive insurance companies writing direct workers' compensation insurance
policies. Captive insurance companies writing direct workers' compensation
insurance policies pursuant to chapter 386 may be subject to article 15 if the
captive insurance company is deemed insolvent. [L 2012, c 253, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next